tests/cases_wiki_sakhatyla.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "Case back-vowel: а": 
    ат<n><sg><nom> : ат
    ат<n><attr> : ат
    ат<n><sg><acc> : аты
    ат<n><sg><par> : атта
    ат<n><sg><dat> : акка
    ат<n><sg><abl> : аттан
    ат<n><sg><ins> : атынан
    ат<n><sg><com> : аттыын
    ат<n><sg><comp> : аттааҕар

  "Case front-vowel: иэ": 
    дьиэ<n><sg><nom> : дьиэ
    дьиэ<n><attr> : дьиэ
    дьиэ<n><sg><acc> : дьиэни
    дьиэ<n><sg><par> : дьиэтэ
    дьиэ<n><sg><dat> : дьиэҕэ
    дьиэ<n><sg><abl> : дьиэттэн
    дьиэ<n><sg><ins> : дьиэнэн
    дьиэ<n><sg><com> : дьиэлиин
    дьиэ<n><sg><comp> : дьиэтээҕэр

  "Case back-vowel: о": 
    ох<n><sg><nom> : ох
    ох<n><attr> : ох
    ох<n><sg><acc> : оҕу
    ох<n><sg><par> : охто
    ох<n><sg><dat> : оххо
    ох<n><sg><abl> : охтон
    ох<n><sg><ins> : оҕунан
    ох<n><sg><com> : охтуун
    ох<n><sg><comp> : охтооҕор

  "Case front-vowel: үө":
    үөр<n><sg><nom> : үөр
    үөр<n><attr> : үөр
    үөр<n><sg><acc> : үөрү
    үөр<n><sg><par> : үөрдэ
    үөр<n><sg><dat> : үөргэ
    үөр<n><sg><abl> : үөртэн
    үөр<n><sg><ins> : үөрүнэн
    үөр<n><sg><com> : үөрдүүн
    үөр<n><sg><comp> : үөрдээҕэр
